sn_ZW/sn_ZW.aff
PFX A 0 muchatu/D . 
PFX A 0 muchatwu/D . 
PFX A 0 muchau/D . 
PFX A 0 muchava/D . 
PFX A 0 muchawa/D . 
PFX A 0 muchawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 muchazai/D . 
PFX A 0 muchazo/D . 
PFX A 0 muchazvi/D . 
PFX A 0 muchi/G . 
PFX A 0 muchido/D . 
PFX A 0 muchifano/D . 
PFX A 0 muchifumo/D . 
PFX A 0 muchigaro/D . 
PFX A 0 muchigo/D . 
PFX A 0 muchiisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 muchimbo/D . 
PFX A 0 muchindo/D . 
PFX A 0 muchingo/D . 
PFX A 0 muchinguno/D . 
PFX A 0 muchino/D . 
PFX A 0 muchinyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 muchinyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 muchisi/D . 
PFX A 0 muchisvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 muchisviko/D . 
PFX A 0 muchiswero/D . 
PFX A 0 muchito/D . 
PFX A 0 muchiwanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 muchizai/D . 
PFX A 0 muchizo/D . 
PFX A 0 muka/G . 
PFX A 0 mukado/D . 
PFX A 0 mukafano/D . 
PFX A 0 mukafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 mukagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 mukago/D . 
PFX A 0 mukaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 mukambo/D . 
PFX A 0 mukando/D . 
PFX A 0 mukango/D . 
PFX A 0 mukanguno/D . 
PFX A 0 mukano/D . 
PFX A 0 mukanyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 mukanyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 mukasi/D . 
PFX A 0 mukasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 mukasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 mukaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 mukato/D . 
PFX A 0 mukawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 mukazai/D . 
PFX A 0 mukazo/D . 
PFX A 0 munga/D . 
PFX A 0 munga/G . 
PFX A 0 mungaa/D . 
PFX A 0 mungachi/D . 
PFX A 0 mungado/D . 
PFX A 0 mungadzi/D . 
PFX A 0 mungafano/D . 
PFX A 0 mungafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 mungagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 mungago/D . 
PFX A 0 mungahu/D . 
PFX A 0 mungahwu/D . 
PFX A 0 mungai/D . 
PFX A 0 mungaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 mungaka/D . 
PFX A 0 mungaku/D . 
PFX A 0 mungambo/D . 
PFX A 0 mungamu/D . 
PFX A 0 mungandi/D . 
PFX A 0 mungando/D . 
PFX A 0 mungango/D . 
PFX A 0 munganguno/D . 
PFX A 0 mungano/D . 
PFX A 0 munganyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 munganyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 mungapa/D . 
PFX A 0 mungari/D . 
PFX A 0 mungaru/D . 
PFX A 0 mungarwu/D . 
PFX A 0 mungasi/D . 
PFX A 0 mungasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 mungasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 mungaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 mungati/D . 
PFX A 0 mungato/D . 
PFX A 0 mungatu/D . 
PFX A 0 mungatwu/D . 
PFX A 0 mungau/D . 
PFX A 0 mungava/D . 
PFX A 0 mungawa/D . 
PFX A 0 mungawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 mungazai/D . 
PFX A 0 mungazo/D . 
PFX A 0 mungazvi/D . 
PFX A 0 muno/D . 
PFX A 0 muno/F . 
PFX A 0 muno/G . 
PFX A 0 munoa/D . 
PFX A 0 munochi/D . 
PFX A 0 munodo/D . 
PFX A 0 munodzi/D . 
PFX A 0 munofano/D . 
PFX A 0 munofumo/D . 
PFX A 0 munogaro/D . 
PFX A 0 munogo/D . 
PFX A 0 munohu/D . 
PFX A 0 munohwu/D . 
PFX A 0 munoi/D . 
PFX A 0 munoisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 munoka/D . 
PFX A 0 munoku/D . 
PFX A 0 munombo/D . 
PFX A 0 munomu/D . 
PFX A 0 munondi/D . 
PFX A 0 munondo/D . 
PFX A 0 munongo/D . 
PFX A 0 munonguno/D . 
PFX A 0 munono/D . 
PFX A 0 munonyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 munonyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 munopa/D . 
PFX A 0 munori/D . 
PFX A 0 munoru/D . 
PFX A 0 munorwu/D . 
PFX A 0 munosi/D . 
PFX A 0 munosvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 munosviko/D . 
PFX A 0 munoswero/D . 
PFX A 0 munoti/D . 
PFX A 0 munoto/D . 
PFX A 0 munotu/D . 
PFX A 0 munotwu/D . 
PFX A 0 munou/D . 
PFX A 0 munova/D . 
PFX A 0 munowa/D . 
PFX A 0 munowanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 munozai/D . 
PFX A 0 munozo/D . 
PFX A 0 munozvi/D . 
PFX A 0 musa/D . 
PFX A 0 musado/D . 
PFX A 0 musafano/D . 
PFX A 0 musafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 musagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 musago/D . 
PFX A 0 musaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 musambo/D . 
PFX A 0 musando/D . 
PFX A 0 musango/D . 
PFX A 0 musanguno/D . 
PFX A 0 musano/D . 
PFX A 0 musanyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 musanyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 musasi/D . 
PFX A 0 musasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 musasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 musaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 musato/D . 
PFX A 0 musawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 musazai/D . 
PFX A 0 musazo/D . 
PFX A 0 musinga/D . 
PFX A 0 musingado/D . 
PFX A 0 musingafano/D . 
PFX A 0 musingafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 musingagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 musingago/D . 
PFX A 0 musingaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 musingambo/D . 
PFX A 0 musingando/D . 
PFX A 0 musingango/D . 
PFX A 0 musinganguno/D . 
PFX A 0 musingano/D . 
PFX A 0 musinganyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 musinganyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 musingasi/D . 
PFX A 0 musingasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 musingasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 musingaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 musingato/D . 
PFX A 0 musingawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 musingazai/D . 
PFX A 0 musingazo/D . 
PFX A 0 musisa/D . 
PFX A 0 musisado/D . 
PFX A 0 musisafano/D . 
PFX A 0 musisafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 musisagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 musisago/D . 
PFX A 0 musisaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 musisambo/D . 
PFX A 0 musisando/D . 
PFX A 0 musisango/D . 
PFX A 0 musisanguno/D . 
PFX A 0 musisano/D . 
PFX A 0 musisanyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 musisanyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 musisasi/D . 
PFX A 0 musisasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 musisasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 musisaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 musisato/D . 
PFX A 0 musisawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 musisazai/D . 
PFX A 0 musisazo/D . 
PFX A 0 na/D . 
PFX A 0 na/G . 
PFX A 0 naa/D . 
PFX A 0 naa/G . 
PFX A 0 naaa/G . 
PFX A 0 naachi/G . 
PFX A 0 naadzi/G . 
PFX A 0 naahu/G . 
PFX A 0 naahwu/G . 
PFX A 0 naai/G . 
PFX A 0 naaiku/G . 
PFX A 0 naaisi/G . 
PFX A 0 naaka/G . 
PFX A 0 naakaa/G . 
PFX A 0 naakachi/G . 
PFX A 0 naakadzi/G . 
PFX A 0 naakahu/G . 
PFX A 0 naakahwu/G . 
PFX A 0 naakai/G . 
PFX A 0 naakaka/G . 
PFX A 0 naakaku/G . 
PFX A 0 naakamu/G . 
PFX A 0 naakandi/G . 
PFX A 0 naakapa/G . 
PFX A 0 naakari/G . 
PFX A 0 naakaru/G . 
PFX A 0 naakarwu/G . 
PFX A 0 naakati/G . 
PFX A 0 naakatu/G . 
PFX A 0 naakatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 naakau/G . 
PFX A 0 naakava/G . 
PFX A 0 naakawa/G . 
PFX A 0 naakazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 naaku/G . 
PFX A 0 naamu/G . 
PFX A 0 naandi/G . 
PFX A 0 naano/G . 
PFX A 0 naanoku/F . 
PFX A 0 naanoku/G . 
PFX A 0 naanosi/G . 
PFX A 0 naapa/G . 
PFX A 0 naari/G . 
PFX A 0 naaru/G . 
PFX A 0 naarwu/G . 
PFX A 0 naati/G . 
PFX A 0 naatu/G . 
PFX A 0 naatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 naau/G . 
PFX A 0 naava/G . 
PFX A 0 naawa/G . 
PFX A 0 naazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 nacha/G . 
PFX A 0 nachaa/G . 
PFX A 0 nachachi/G . 
PFX A 0 nachadzi/G . 
PFX A 0 nachahu/G . 
PFX A 0 nachahwu/G . 
PFX A 0 nachai/G . 
PFX A 0 nachaiku/G . 
PFX A 0 nachaisi/G . 
PFX A 0 nachaka/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakaa/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakachi/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakadzi/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakahu/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakahwu/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakai/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakaka/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakaku/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakamu/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakandi/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakapa/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakari/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakaru/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakarwu/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakati/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakatu/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakau/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakava/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakawa/G . 
PFX A 0 nachakazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 nachaku/G . 
PFX A 0 nachamu/G . 
PFX A 0 nachandi/G . 
PFX A 0 nachapa/G . 
PFX A 0 nachari/G . 
PFX A 0 nacharu/G . 
PFX A 0 nacharwu/G . 
PFX A 0 nachati/G . 
PFX A 0 nachatu/G . 
PFX A 0 nachatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 nachau/G . 
PFX A 0 nachava/G . 
PFX A 0 nachawa/G . 
PFX A 0 nachazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 nachi/D . 
PFX A 0 nachino/G . 
PFX A 0 nachinoku/F . 
PFX A 0 nachinoku/G . 
PFX A 0 nachinosi/G . 
PFX A 0 nado/D . 
PFX A 0 nado/G . 
PFX A 0 nadza/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzaa/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzachi/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzadzi/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzahu/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzahwu/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzai/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzaiku/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzaisi/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzaka/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakaa/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakachi/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakadzi/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakahu/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakahwu/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakai/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakaka/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakaku/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakamu/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakandi/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakapa/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakari/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakaru/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakarwu/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakati/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakatu/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakau/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakava/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakawa/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzakazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzaku/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzamu/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzandi/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzapa/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzari/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzaru/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzarwu/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzati/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzatu/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzau/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzava/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzawa/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzi/D . 
PFX A 0 nadzino/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzinoku/F . 
PFX A 0 nadzinoku/G . 
PFX A 0 nadzinosi/G . 
PFX A 0 nafano/D . 
PFX A 0 nafano/G . 
PFX A 0 nafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 nafumo/G . 
PFX A 0 nagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 nagaro/G . 
