sn_ZW/sn_ZW.dic
araidza/AVQ
bambazira/AVQ
barabadika/AVQ
batsirira/AVQ
bepetuka/AVQ
bhabhanuka/AVQ
bhamura/AVQ
bhejera/AVQ
bhigura/AVQ
bhongozhora/AVQ
bhura/AVQ
bibitsa/AVQ
binduka/AVQ
bisha/AVQ
boeka/AVQ
bongozeka/AVQ
bowesa/AVQ
budura/AVQ
bundudza/AVQ
burukisa/AVQ
bvakachira/AVQ
bvaruka/AVQ
bvinha/AVQ
bvokora/AVQ
bvotora/AVQ
bvukucha/AVQ
bvumirira/AVQ
bvunzana/AVQ
bvuurura/AVQ
bwata/AVQ
bwerengedza/AVQ
bwira/AVQ
chabwaidza/AVQ
chachuka/AVQ
chakura/AVQ
chapatidza/AVQ
chayira/AVQ
chedebura/AVQ
chembedza/AVQ
chengetera/AVQ
chenyura/AVQ
cheukisa/AVQ
chikinya/AVQ
chinjisa/AVQ
chobora/AVQ
chonya/AVQ
chururudza/AVQ
dadisa/AVQ
dambadzika/AVQ
daranirano/AVQ
dedemadza/AVQ
dembedzeka/AVQ
denheka/AVQ
deuka/AVQ
dhadharisa/AVQ
dhavaza/AVQ
dhigidha/AVQ
dhirisa/AVQ
dhomora/AVQ
dhumana/AVQ
dhuvuka/AVQ
dimika/AVQ
diva/AVQ
dondana/AVQ
dootsa/AVQ
dukupisa/AVQ
dunga/AVQ
duumidza/AVQ
dyiswa/AVQ
dzakaira/AVQ
dzasira/AVQ
dzengereka/AVQ
dzikatidza/AVQ
dzimbwa/AVQ
dzipa/AVQ
dziya/AVQ
dzomha/AVQ
dzudza/AVQ
dzunha/AVQ
dzvanya/AVQ
dzvokora/AVQ
dzwanya/AVQ
emedzana/AVQ
enura/AVQ
fa/AVQ
faitira/AVQ
fanduka/AVQ
farisa/AVQ
fazha/AVQ
fekuka/AVQ
fendemutsa/AVQ
ferenga/AVQ
fetyemara/AVQ
finyama/AVQ
fodogora/AVQ
fona/AVQ
foonyora/AVQ
fovedza/AVQ
fufudzika/AVQ
fugiridza/AVQ
fukudzika/AVQ
fumbira/AVQ
funduka/AVQ
fungidzisa/AVQ
funzuka/AVQ
furira/AVQ
fusha/AVQ
fututika/AVQ
gabhuka/AVQ
gadziridza/AVQ
gakaira/AVQ
gangaridza/AVQ
garika/AVQ
gayisa/AVQ
gigidza/AVQ
godora/AVQ
gombedzera/AVQ
gonera/AVQ
govanisa/AVQ
gudubura/AVQ
gukuchirira/AVQ
gumbura/AVQ
gundurudza/AVQ
gurira/AVQ
gusva/AVQ
gwabadika/AVQ
gwama/AVQ
gwatakwata/AVQ
gwedemudza/AVQ
gwesha-gwesha/AVQ
gwishuka/AVQ
hatuka/AVQ
hodha/AVQ
humwidza/AVQ
hwapurira/AVQ
hwijura/AVQ
ima/AVQ
irasa/AVQ
jadarika/AVQ
jamura/AVQ
jekenyeka/AVQ
jitikisa/AVQ
joza/AVQ
kachidza/AVQ
kakaira/AVQ
kakatira/AVQ
kamukira/AVQ
kandurira/AVQ
kangazha/AVQ
kanyanidza/AVQ
karakatika/AVQ
karura/AVQ
katanura/AVQ
kavhanga/AVQ
kengeka/AVQ
kitsa/AVQ
kochenidza/AVQ
kodzva/AVQ
kokonyara/AVQ
komberera/AVQ
kondomara/AVQ
konyora/AVQ
korekedza/AVQ
korowedza/AVQ
kotamisa/AVQ
kovodza/AVQ
kuchumura/AVQ
kukurika/AVQ
kumbushuka/AVQ
kundira/AVQ
kurudzira/AVQ
kusha/AVQ
kututa/AVQ
kwadabvura/AVQ
kwanyanutsa/AVQ
kwazisana/AVQ
kweretesa/AVQ
kwinyira/AVQ
manidzira/AVQ
mbarangidza/AVQ
mbwedza/AVQ
mhanyira/AVQ
minyuka/AVQ
monyongodza/AVQ
mvemveteka/AVQ
mwauka/AVQ
naka/AVQ
nanazika/AVQ
nayisa/AVQ
ndingindira/AVQ
nekudza/AVQ
ngambaira/AVQ
ngondomora/AVQ
nguya/AVQ
nhamhura/AVQ
niandayidza/AVQ
njanjarika/AVQ
njuvaira/AVQ
n'un'unura/AVQ
nyambaidza/AVQ
nyanyaidza/AVQ
nyeka/AVQ
nyeruka/AVQ
nyirira/AVQ
nyubwaira/AVQ
nzinwi/AVQ
nzwidura/AVQ
ondomoka/AVQ
pabaduka/AVQ
pakasa/AVQ
pamudza/AVQ
panjira/AVQ
paridzira/AVQ
pauka/AVQ
pemhena/AVQ
pera-pera/AVQ
peya/AVQ
pfawa/AVQ
pfinya/AVQ
pfovera/AVQ
pfumanidza/AVQ
pfunga/AVQ
pfurisa/AVQ
pigidara/AVQ
pindurira/AVQ
piri/AVQ
podoka/AVQ
popoma/AVQ
psvairisa/AVQ
pungudza/AVQ
puruka/AVQ
puzhikidza/AVQ
pwititidza/AVQ
rakada/AVQ
ranjangudza/AVQ
raudza/AVQ
reka/AVQ
rerekedza/AVQ
ridimuka/AVQ
ringisa/AVQ
rondedza/AVQ
rovedza/AVQ
rumbidza/AVQ
ruza/AVQ
sainira/AVQ
sanganisira/AVQ
sebera/AVQ
senyura/AVQ
shaira/AVQ
shangashika/AVQ
shaya/AVQ
shingisa/AVQ
shomanene/AVQ
shova/AVQ
shuta/AVQ
simba/AVQ
sitiraika/AVQ
sorera/AVQ
sunamisa/AVQ
surudza/AVQ
svanhamuka/AVQ
svetukira/AVQ
svira/AVQ
svororedza/AVQ
swatanudza/AVQ
taima/AVQ
tambirisa/AVQ
tandira/AVQ
tapidza/AVQ
tasamuka/AVQ
taurirana/AVQ
tekedzara/AVQ
tendedza/AVQ
tenuka/AVQ
tetemara/AVQ
tibitsira/AVQ
tindinyara/AVQ
tivhaira/AVQ
tondedza/AVQ
totovara/AVQ
tsanyaura/AVQ
tseketsva/AVQ
tsidza/AVQ
tsindimuka/AVQ
tsividza/AVQ
tsubvunuka/AVQ
tsurudzira/AVQ
tsvatidza/AVQ
tsveyamisa/AVQ
tsvukisa/AVQ
tuka/AVQ
tundumwara/AVQ
turikidzanisa/AVQ
tuvhaira/AVQ
tyoranisa/AVQ
unda/AVQ
uruka/AVQ
vambamira/AVQ
vata/AVQ
vereresa/AVQ
vharisa/AVQ
vhima/AVQ
vhorongonya/AVQ
vhundutsa/AVQ
vimbikana/AVQ
vuka/AVQ
wanzura/AVQ
whandanyuka/AVQ
wuna/AVQ
yawira/AVQ
yowira/AVQ
zembera/AVQ
zhaura/AVQ
zingaira/AVQ
zumbuka/AVQ
zvarira/AVQ
zvipira/AVQ
